Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5857.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.525 RCW to read as follows:(1) School districts shall select their architectural and engineering consultants in accordance with chapter 39.80 RCW. As required by RCW 39.80.050, the district shall negotiate a contract with the most qualified consultants at a price which the school district determines is fair and reasonable. In making its determination, the district must take into account the estimated value of the services to be rendered based upon the scope and complexity of the project.(2) The state maximum allowable cost for architectural and engineering services must be based on the latest edition of the American institute of architect's handbook of professional practice and calculated by the percentage of construction cost in relation to the square foot area of construction and project type, as set forth in this subsection.(a) For new construction projects the limits of state funding assistance are as follows:Â Square Feet ofConstructionPercent ofConstruction Cost0-3,699Â 5.03,700-7,349Â 4.57,350-10,999Â 4.37511,000-14,649Â 4.2514,650-18,299Â 4.12518,300-25,699Â 4.025,700-36,699Â 3.87536,700-54,999Â 3.7555,000-73,399Â 3.62573,400-100,999Â 3.5101,000-128,449Â 3.375128,450-155,999Â 3.25156,000-183,499Â 3.125183,500& aboveÂ 3.0(b) For modernization projects the limits of state funding assistance is 1.5 times the amount calculated for new construction.(c) For those projects which include a combination of new construction and modernization, the limits of state participation must be prorated as set forth in (a) and (b) of this subsection.--- END ---